Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2643
Records; requirements.

(1) All applicators applying restricted-use pesticides are required to maintain records of the use of all restricted-use pesticides. Licensed certified applicators who supervise noncertified applicators are required to document and maintain or verify the existence of and have access to the records required to be maintained by 40 C.F.R. 171.201. The department may by rules and regulations prescribe the information to be included in the records.

(2) The department may require a license holder to keep records of the licensee's use of general-use pesticides. The department may by rules and regulations prescribe the information to be included in the records.

(3) The license holder shall keep records required under this section for a period of three years from the date of the pesticide use.

(4) The license holder shall provide the department access to such records and a copy of any requested record pertaining to the use of pesticides.

Laws 1993, LB 588, § 22;

Laws 2002, LB 436, § 17;

Laws 2019, LB320, § 15.